California, session 20252026, AB1580.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 24304.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:24304.2. (a) Notwithstanding Section 24300, in the Counties of Amador, Lake, Mendocino, Santa Cruz, Sonoma, Trinity, and Tulare, the board of supervisors, by ordinance, may consolidate the duties of the offices of Auditor-Controller and Treasurer-Tax Collector into the elected office of Auditor-Controller-Treasurer-Tax Collector. The(b) The board of supervisors of the County of Amador or Lake shall not so consolidate these offices until a vacancy in either the office of Auditor-Controller or in the office of Treasurer-Tax Collector occurs.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the particular need to consolidate the duties of the offices of Auditor-Controller and Treasurer-Tax Collector into the elected office of Auditor-Controller-Treasurer-Tax Collector in the County of Amador.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to protect the fiscal health of the County of Amador and to ensure that the fiscal and accounting needs of the County of Amador continue to be met, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.